Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Operation and Regulation

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184, redesignated former Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 1, which consisted of Code Sections 7-1-650 through 7-1-670, as Part 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 1.

7-1-650.
Powers.

A credit union shall have, in addition to the powers common to all corporations under the laws of this state, the power to:

Receive funds from its members or other financial institutions in the form of shares and deposits on accounts or as evidenced by certificates of deposit issued by the credit union;

Receive savings deposits from nonmembers, provided that such deposits are:

Insured by or through a federal public body or are expressly authorized by state or federal law;

Made in such a manner as expressly authorized by the bylaws;

Not deposited in a share draft account; and

Not bearing a greater rate of interest than the rate of interest paid to members for the same class of deposit;

Make loans to members subject to approval by its credit committee or authorized employees pursuant to Code Section 7-1-658;

On the authority of its board of directors or by employees authorized by the board of directors, invest:

In obligations of the United States, including bonds and securities upon which payment of principal and interest is fully guaranteed by the United States; obligations issued by banks for cooperatives, federal land banks, federal intermediate credit banks, federal home loan banks, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, or any corporation designated in Section 846 of Title 31 of the United States Code as a wholly owned government corporation; or in obligations, participations, or other instruments of or issued by or fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the Federal National Mortgage Association or the Government National Mortgage Association;

In general and direct obligations of the State of Georgia, its counties, districts, and municipalities which have been validated as provided by law, if no more than 25 percent of the shares and deposits of a credit union shall be invested in the obligations of any one such obligor;

In loans to other credit unions, provided the loans do not exceed 10 percent of the shares, deposits, and surplus of the investing credit union;

By depositing its funds in banks, savings and loan associations, and credit unions; by purchasing certificates of deposit and savings certificates which such financial institutions are authorized to issue; by selling or purchasing federal or correspondent (daily) funds through such financial institutions; and by selling or purchasing whole loans or loan participations. The authorizations in this subparagraph shall be subject to limitations prescribed in regulations issued by the department; and

In any other types of investments authorized by the department, including commercial paper, provided that such investments shall not, in the aggregate, exceed 10 percent of the shares, deposits, and surplus of the investing credit union or 15 percent of its equity capital, as defined by the department, in authorized investments issued by any single obligor;

Borrow from any source, provided that the total of such borrowings shall at no time exceed 50 percent of paid-in shares, deposits, and surplus. The department may, notwithstanding the other provisions of this Code section, temporarily waive the requirements of this paragraph to permit an individual credit union to borrow for emergency purposes;

Undertake, with the approval of the department, other activities which are not inconsistent with this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto; provided, however, that no such approval shall be granted unless the commissioner determines the activities do not present undue safety and soundness risks to the credit union involved;

Organize and engage in business without having any stated amount of capital subscribed or paid in other than that derived from the subscribers’ qualifying shares, commence business with only such capital authorized and paid in as may be provided in its bylaws, and provide for the payment and withdrawal thereof as and in the manner provided by its bylaws;

Purchase, hold, and convey real estate for the following purposes only:

Such real estate as the credit union occupies or intends to occupy primarily for the transaction of its business, subject to the prior approval of the department except to the extent authorized by regulation;

Such real estate as shall be conveyed to it in satisfaction of debt previously contracted in the course of its business; and

Such real estate as it shall purchase at sales under judgments, decrees, or mortgage foreclosures pursuant to mortgages or security deeds held by it;

Hold real estate acquired in the cases provided for by subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (8) of this Code section and real estate which has ceased to be used primarily as credit union premises, subject to a determination by a majority vote of its directors at least once each year as to the advisability of retaining any such property and provided that no such property is held for more than five years without the prior written approval of the department;

Hold property other than real estate, which is acquired in satisfaction of debts previously contracted and which a credit union is not otherwise authorized to own, for no longer than six months unless such time period is extended by the department;

Dispose of property held pursuant to paragraphs (9) and (10) of this subsection through financing by the credit union without the advance of additional funds irrespective of the purchasers’ membership in the credit union and of ordinarily applicable collateral margin requirements;

Provide, in its articles of incorporation approved by a majority of its membership present and voting, for the elimination or limitation of personal liability of a director to the credit union or its members in their capacity as shareholders of the credit union to the same extent as a bank or trust company operating under the provisions of this chapter;

Subject to any rules and regulations enacted by the department and in compliance with federal law and applicable provisions regarding insurable interests in Chapter 24 of Title 33, purchase, hold, or fund insurance on the life of any of its directors, officers, or employees, or any other person whose death might cause financial loss to the credit union, or, pursuant to any contract lawfully obligating the credit union as guarantor or surety, on the life of the principal obligor;

Provide third-party payment services to its members; and

Provide check-cashing services, sale of payment instruments, or sale of international remittances to those consumers eligible for membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 8; Code 1933, § 25-105; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-3101, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, §§ 12-14; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 300, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 26; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 17/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 3-2/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 17/HB 143; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 13/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 20/HB 185; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 24/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (11); in paragraph (12), substituted “in its articles of incorporation approved by a majority” for “through an amendment to its bylaws approved by two-thirds” near the beginning, inserted “credit union or its” in the middle, and added “; and” at the end; and added paragraph (13). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subparagraph (4)(D), in the middle, deleted “and” preceding “by selling or purchasing”, deleted “, whole loans, or loan participations” following “(daily) funds”, and inserted “and by selling or purchasing whole loans or loan participations. The authorizations in this subparagraph shall be” near the end.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “but shall not have the power to offer third-party payment services except as authorized under Code Section 7-1-670” from the end of paragraph (1), deleted “and” from the end of paragraph (12), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (13), and added paragraphs (14) and (15).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (8)” was substituted for “subparagraph (8)(B) and (C)” in the first sentence of paragraph (9).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, in paragraph (7), a correction was made in the word “business” the second time it appears.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-651.
Membership; shares.

The membership of the credit union shall consist of the initial subscribers and such other persons within the field of membership as may have subscribed to one share, which has been paid by a person or the credit union, together with the required entrance fee and complied with all other requirements contained in the bylaws. No subscriber or other member shall hold more than one share out of any class of shares. The bylaws may provide for separate classes of shares for borrowers and depositors and for the par value of each share for each class, but in no event shall the par value be less than $1.00.

Societies, associations, partnerships, and corporations composed of persons who are eligible for membership or headquartered within the field of membership may be admitted to membership in the same manner and under the same conditions as such persons.

A person or corporation who leaves the field of membership may be permitted to retain his membership in the credit union at the discretion of the board of directors.

Customers of a bank that have been acquired by a credit union as a result of a merger or purchase and where the bank will cease to exist, due to a voluntary or involuntary dissolution, shall become members of the credit union upon the effective date of the underlying transaction; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be deemed as permitting a public body to be a member of a credit union. As used in this subsection, the term “public body” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 45-8-1.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, §§ 1, 9; Code 1933, §§ 25-101, 25-108; Code 1933, § 41A-3102, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 823, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 7/HB 141; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 20/HB 184; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 18/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 21/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (d).

7-1-651.1.
In-person annual meetings; requirements for remote options; impact of emergency declaration.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the annual meeting of the members shall be held in person.

Members may participate and vote remotely at the meetings of the members if the bylaws of the credit union explicitly provide an option for remote participation and voting. If the bylaws so provide, the board of directors shall:

Implement reasonable measures to:

Provide members a reasonable opportunity to remotely participate in such meetings. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, audio webcast or other broadcast of the meeting but, in every instance, shall provide members the ability to communicate substantially concurrently with the proceedings;

Enable members to vote at such meetings by means of electronic communication. Such measures may include, but are not limited to, telephonic or internet voting; and

Verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote remotely is a member in order to ensure the integrity of the vote;

Provide the option for remote participation and voting at no cost to members; and

Keep a record of remote attendance by members and any vote or other action taken by a member participating remotely.

In the event of a proclaimed emergency pursuant to Code Section 7-1-111, the board of directors may apply to the department for authorization to conduct a meeting of the members solely through remote participation. If such application is approved by the department, the board of directors shall comply with the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-651.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 30/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 25/HB 891.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or grant proxies” following “vote” in the first sentence in subparagraph (b)(1)(B).

7-1-652.
Joint, minor, and trust shares and deposits; preferred capital base shares.

A share may be issued and deposits received jointly in the names of a member and a nonmember with right of survivorship, but no joint tenant shall be permitted to vote, obtain loans, or hold office unless he is within the field of membership and is a qualified member.

A minor shall be allowed to have deposits in a credit union in his own name, and the deposits made by the minor shall not be subject to the control of his parent, guardian, or trustee. A minor may have third-party payment accounts. A receipt or acquittance signed by such a minor depositor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of such credit union for any payment of any deposit to such minor. In the transactions involving payments to third parties out of the minor’s account, the payment of an order of the minor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the credit union for any payment of such funds from the minor’s account. This subsection shall continue to include, without limitation:

Deposits in such credit unions by a minor with one or more adults or other minors, as party to and with the same effect as a multiple-party account under Article 8 of this chapter;

The rental to a minor by said credit unions of a safe-deposit box or other receptacle for the safe deposit of property from such minor (and the receipt of any such property), individually or jointly with one or more adults; and

The dealing with a minor by said credit unions with respect to such a deposit account, third-party payment account, or safe-deposit agreement without the consent of a parent or guardian and with the same effect as though the minor were an adult.

Any action of the minor with respect to such deposit account, third-party payment account, or safe-deposit agreement shall be binding on the minor with the same effect as though the minor were an adult.

In addition to its regular shares, a credit union may offer to its members “preferred capital base” shares when permitted by its bylaws. Such shares may be held without limit, shall be subject to the following restrictions, and may entitle the holder to the following rights and preferences:

Such shares shall have no par value;

Such shares shall be redeemed only at a stated maturity of not less than one year or within ten days of such maturity;

Such shares shall be transferable on the books of the credit union so long as the acquiring person is a member of the credit union;

Such shares may have a preference on the payment of dividends and interest up to 2 percent over the dividend rate paid to members on regular shares and deposits or such higher rates as approved by the credit union members and the department. Any such preference shall be fixed at the time of issuance of the shares; and

Such shares shall be subordinate to claims of depositors and other creditors in the event of liquidation of the credit union but shall rank ahead of the claims of regular shares.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 17; Code 1933, § 25-111; Code 1933, § 41A-3103, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 823, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, “and” was added following the semicolon at the end of paragraph (c)(4).

Cross references.

Multiple-party accounts, §

7-1-810

et seq.

7-1-653.
Expulsions and withdrawals; disposition of deposits, interest, shares, or dividends; reinstatement.

At any regular or called meeting of the members, by a two-thirds’ vote of those present, the members may expel from the credit union any member thereof. A member may withdraw from a credit union and a nonmember may withdraw deposits as provided in this Code section by filing a written notice of such intention. All deposits of an expelled or withdrawing member or nonmember with any interest accrued shall be paid to such member or nonmember, subject to 60 days’ notice, after deducting any amounts due to the credit union by such member or nonmember. A credit union, upon the resignation or expulsion of a member, shall cancel the share, deposits, or dividends or interest due thereon and may apply the withdrawal value of such funds toward the liquidation of such member’s indebtedness. Said expelled or withdrawing member or nonmember shall have no further right in said credit union or to any of its benefits, but such expulsion or withdrawal shall not operate to relieve said member or nonmember from any remaining liability to the credit union.

A member may be expelled for reasons defined in the bylaws by a two-thirds’ vote of the board of directors. An expelled member may obtain reinstatement by an affirmative vote of the majority of the members voting at the next annual meeting of the credit union.

In addition to the other powers set forth in this Code section, the board of directors may, by a two-thirds’ vote of the directors, adopt and enforce a policy with respect to expulsion from membership based on:

Nonparticipation by a member in the affairs of the credit union. Such policy shall require the board to consider a member’s failure to maintain deposits, shares, or loans with the credit union;

Activity inconsistent with the safe and sound operation of the credit union, which may include, but shall not be limited to:

Causing a financial loss to the credit union;

Disrupting the operations of the credit union;

Committing fraud, attempted fraud, or other illegal behavior;

Engaging in inappropriate behavior; and

Violating the membership agreement of the credit union.

If such a policy is adopted, written notice of the policy and the effective date of such policy shall be provided to each member of the credit union not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of such policy. In addition, each new member shall be provided written notice of any such policy prior to or upon applying for membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, §§ 16, 21; Code 1933, §§ 25-109, 25-110; Code 1933, §§ 41A-3104, 41A-3105, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 18/SB 82; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 22/HB 185; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 31/HB 111.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (c), which read: “In addition to the other powers set forth in this Code section, the board of directors may, by a two-thirds’ vote of the directors, adopt and enforce a policy with respect to expulsion from membership based on nonparticipation by a member in the affairs of the credit union. In establishing its policy, the board of directors should consider a member’s failure to maintain deposits or shares with the credit union and whether the member has a loan with the credit union. If such a policy is adopted, written notice of the policy and the effective date of such policy shall be provided to each member of the credit union not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of such policy. In addition, each new member shall be provided written notice of any such policy prior to or upon applying for membership.”

7-1-654.
Capital; right to offset loans, dues, and fines.

The capital of the credit union shall consist of the payments that have been made to it by the members on their qualifying shares. A credit union shall have a lien on a member’s share and deposits and on dividends or interest payable thereon for and to the extent of any loan made by it to such member and of any dues and fines payable to it by such member.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 16; Code 1933, § 25-110; Code 1933, § 41A-3105, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-655.
Boards of directors; credit and audit committees; officers; oaths of officials; removal from office; suspension of member; filling of vacancies; notification to department of change in president or chief executive officer.

At the first annual meeting, the members shall elect from among their number a board of directors of no less than five nor more than 25 and at each annual meeting thereafter shall elect successors to the members of the board of directors whose terms of office expire at such annual meeting.

Except as this Code section permits the bylaws of a credit union to provide otherwise, members of the board of directors elected at the first annual meeting shall serve until the next annual meeting and until their successors are elected and qualified. A credit union may in its bylaws provide for staggered elections for members of the board of directors; but in that event the bylaws shall provide that as nearly as possible one-third of the board shall be elected at each annual meeting.

At the organizational meeting and at its first meeting after each annual meeting of the members, the board of directors shall appoint an audit committee, credit committee, chairperson, secretary, and such other officers consistent with the bylaws as the board deems desirable. No member of the audit committee may serve as a member of the credit committee or as an officer, unless the board of directors functions as the credit committee as provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 7-1-658.

The chairperson of the credit and audit committees shall be appointed by the board from among its number. Both the credit and audit committees shall be accountable to the board and members of such committees may be removed by the board.

Officers and the committee members elected or appointed at the organizational meeting shall serve until the first annual meeting. Thereafter, the terms of such persons shall be until their successors are chosen or have duly qualified. An officer elected or appointed to fill an unexpired term shall be elected or appointed for the balance of that term.

All members of the board and all officers and committee members shall be sworn to perform faithfully the duties of their several offices in accordance with this chapter and the bylaws or as otherwise lawfully established. The oaths shall be subscribed in writing and a copy thereof shall be retained in the minutes of the meetings of the board. The oaths shall not modify in any manner the legal duties of or the standard of care for members and officers in the exercise of such duties.

The entire board of directors or an individual director may be removed from office without cause by the vote of a quorum of members at a properly called meeting.

The board may remove a director from office if:

The director is adjudicated an incompetent by a court or is convicted of a felony;

The director does not, within 60 days of his or her election or such longer time as may be specified in the bylaws, accept the office in writing or by attendance at a meeting and fulfill other requirements for holding the office;

The director fails to attend regular meetings of the board for six successive meetings without having been excused by the board;

The director was an employee or duly elected officer of the credit union and was discharged or resigned at the request of the board for reasons relating to performance of duties as an employee or officer of the credit union; or

For any reason set forth in the bylaws of the credit union.

The board of directors, by a two-thirds’ vote of a quorum of the board, may suspend any member of the credit union’s board of directors, for cause, until the next membership meeting, which shall be held not less than seven nor more than 60 days after such suspension. The suspended person will be notified of the details of his or her suspension, and shall have the right to request a meeting with the board to reconsider his or her suspension prior to the membership meeting. Any suspended member of the board of directors may be removed by a majority vote of a quorum of members at a properly called meeting. At such meeting of the membership, the suspended person shall have the right to make a presentation to the members and the suspension shall be acted upon by the members at such meeting and the person shall be removed from, or restored to, the board.

Vacancies in the board of directors, whether caused by removal or otherwise and including vacancies resulting from an increase in the number of directors, may be filled by the remaining members of the board, even though less than a quorum.

The credit union shall immediately notify the department upon a change in president or chief executive officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 12; Code 1933, § 25-112; Ga. L. 1962, p. 74, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3106, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1681, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 13; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 4/HB 239; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 21/HB 184; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 3-3/HB 811; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 14/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 23/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 26/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, added the last sentence of subsection (f). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “an audit committee” for “a supervisory committee” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (c); and substituted “audit” for “supervisory” near the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (c) and in the first and second sentences of subsection (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “chairperson” for “chairman” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “president,” following “chairperson,” in the first sentence in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-656.
Duties of directors; meetings; prohibited activities; eligibility to vote; applicability of Code Section 7-1-490; appointment of honorary director or director emeritus.

The board of directors shall be responsible for the affairs, funds, and records of the credit union and shall meet as often as necessary. The board of directors shall meet at least once during ten different months of each calendar year unless an alternative schedule is approved in writing by the department, but in no event shall the board meet less frequently than once in each calendar quarter. Unless the bylaws specifically reserve any or all of the duties to the members, it shall be the special duty of the directors:

To act upon all applications for membership or approve the actions of an officer without loan granting authority, designated by the board of directors to approve applications for membership;

To determine from time to time rates of interest and dividends which shall be allowed on deposits and charged on loans consistent with this article and other applicable laws and to authorize any interest refunds on such classes of loans and under such conditions as the board prescribes;

To fix the amount of the fidelity bond which shall be required of all officers, employees, agents, or members having custody of funds, properties, or records; provided, however, that the amount of such fidelity bond shall not be less than such minimum requirements as shall be prescribed by regulation of the department and shall be in such form as may from time to time be approved by the department;

To fix within the restrictions imposed by statute the maximum amount of deposits which may be made by and the maximum amount that may be loaned to any one member;

To fill vacancies on the board of directors, credit committee, and audit committee until the election and qualification of a successor;

To have charge of the investment of funds of the credit union other than loans to members within the restrictions imposed by statute or delegate investment authority to a qualified committee or officer as designated by the board of directors;

To appoint any committees deemed necessary; and

To perform such other duties as the members may from time to time authorize.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws of a credit union:

A majority of all directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and actions of a majority of those present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be deemed as actions of the board of directors;

The board of directors may designate three or more of its number to constitute a credit committee, audit committee, or other committees which, to the extent provided in a resolution, shall have and exercise the authority of the board of directors with regard to the business of a credit union; and

Any action authorized to be taken at a meeting of the board of directors or a credit, audit, or other committee may be taken without a meeting if the action is set forth in writing and approved and signed by all directors or all members of the credit, audit, or other committee entitled to vote with respect to the underlying subject matter.

No director, officer, or committee member of a credit union shall:

Receive anything of value for procuring or attempting to procure any loan from or investment by such credit union;

Purchase, or directly or indirectly be interested in purchasing, from the credit union a promissory note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by the credit union for less than face value; or

Purchase or sell any other asset to the credit union except:

Upon terms not less than favorable to the credit union than those offered other persons or corporations; and

With prior approval of the board of directors or a committee thereof authorized to act for the board, unless the transaction is made in the regular course of business.

No director shall be eligible to vote concerning any purchase or sale when such director is or would be a party to the transaction.

The provisions of Code Section 7-1-490 relative to the responsibilities of directors and officers and the delegation of investment decisions shall be applicable to the duties of directors, credit and audit committee members, and officers of credit unions.

The board of directors may appoint an individual as an honorary director or director emeritus or member of an advisory board. An individual so appointed may be compensated but shall not vote at any meeting of the board of directors or be counted in determining a quorum and shall not have any responsibility for or be subject to any liability imposed upon a director or otherwise be deemed a director.

The board of directors may determine that a meeting of such board will be held, in whole or in part, by any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by such means shall be considered to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 13; Code 1933, § 25-113; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-3107, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 32; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 14; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 19/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 22/HB 184; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 15/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 24/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 10/HB 781; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 32/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 27/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, added subsection (f). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “audit” for “supervisory” in paragraph (a)(5), in the middle of paragraph (b)(2), and near the end of subsection (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “audit” for “supervisory” twice in paragraph (b)(3).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (g).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote the former first sentence in subsection (a), which read: “The board of directors shall be responsible for the affairs, funds, and records of the credit union and shall meet as often as necessary, but at least once during ten different months of each calendar year.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-657.
Duties of audit committee; inspections; comprehensive annual audits; use of independent accountants.

The audit committee shall be responsible for securing a comprehensive audit of the credit union at least once each year unless such time period is modified pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department. Except as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, the committee shall employ the services of a licensed, independent certified public accountant or firm of such accountants to make such comprehensive audit. The results of the audit shall be submitted to the board, and the committee shall present a summary of the results of the audit to the membership. The committee shall make recommendations to the board for the correction of any deficiencies disclosed by the audit. The annual audit shall include a confirmation of the share, deposit, and loan accounts of the members and such other procedures as the department might require. The annual audit shall be preserved with the records of the credit union, and a copy of such audit shall be filed with the department upon request by the department.

The audit committee, from time to time, may conduct or cause to be conducted other audit functions or reviews of operations or may make or cause to be made an inspection of the assets and the liabilities of the credit union. The committee shall report the results of any such reviews to the board of directors and shall be responsible for making specific recommendations to the board regarding any unsafe, unsound, or unauthorized activities discovered.

Based upon the total assets of a credit union, the complexity of a credit union, or other factors, the department may enact rules and regulations authorizing certain credit unions to obtain the required comprehensive audit from an individual or entity that is not a licensed, independent certified public accountant or firm of such accountants so long as the individual or entity is independent or otherwise qualified.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 15; Code 1933, § 25-114; Code 1933, § 41A-3108, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 9; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 7; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 23/HB 184; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 19/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 25/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “audit” for “supervisory” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsections (a) and (b).